Maryland, session 2026, SB0821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) On or before December 31, 2026, the Department of General Services shall
initiate proceedings to acquire the property located at 11255 New Hampshire Avenue,
Silver Spring, Maryland, 20904, otherwise known as the Abandoned Sears Building.
(b) The Department of General Services shall acquire the property as quickly as
is practicable:
(1) by purchase or, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article
of the Annotated Code of Maryland, condemnation; and
(2) for a public purpose.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0821*